Utah statutes.
16-6a-203.   Incorporation.

(1)  A nonprofit corporation is incorporated, and its corporate existence begins:

(a)  when the articles of incorporation are filed by the division; or

(b)  if a delayed effective date is specified pursuant to Subsection 16-6a-108(2), on the delayed effective date, unless a certificate of withdrawal is filed prior to the delayed effective date.

(2)  The filing of the articles of incorporation by the division is conclusive proof that all conditions precedent to incorporation have been satisfied, except in a proceeding by the state to:

(a)  cancel or revoke the incorporation; or

(b)  involuntarily dissolve the nonprofit corporation.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

